Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1202
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act are to: (1) Provide for the protection of ground water through the licensing and regulation of water well contractors, pump installation contractors, water well drilling supervisors, pump installation supervisors, water well monitoring technicians, and natural resources ground water technicians in the State of Nebraska; (2) protect the health and general welfare of the citizens of the state; (3) protect ground water resources from potential pollution by providing for proper siting and construction of water wells and proper decommissioning of water wells; and (4) provide data on potential water supplies through well logs which will promote the economic and efficient utilization and management of the water resources of the state.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1144.